Vermont, session 2025-2026, H418.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 32 V.S.A. chapter 204 is added to read:
CHAPTER 204. FIREARMS EXCISE TAX
§ 7631. DEFINITIONS
As used in this chapter:
(1) “Ammunition” has the same meaning as in 18 U.S.C. § 921(a)(17).
VT LEG #379030 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.418
2025 Page 2 of 5
(2) “Ammunition vendor” means a person who sells ammunition and
meets the definition of vendor under subdivision 9701(9) of this title.
(3) “Commissioner” means the Commissioner of Taxes.
(4) “Firearm” has the same meaning as in 13 V.S.A. § 4017(d).
(5) “Firearm precursor part” means an “unfinished frame or receiver” or
“firearm control component” as defined in 13 V.S.A. § 4082.
(6) “Licensed firearm dealer” means a person issued a license as a
dealer in firearms pursuant to 18 U.S.C. § 923(a).
(7) “Retail sale” means any sale for any purpose other than for resale by
a licensed firearm dealer.
(8) “Sales price” has the same meaning as in section 9701 of this title.
§ 7632. FIREARMS EXCISE TAX
(a) There is imposed an excise tax on licensed firearm dealers and
ammunition vendors equal to 11 percent of the gross receipts from the retail
sale in this State of any firearm, firearm precursor part, or ammunition.
(b) Retail sales of a firearm, firearm precursor part, or ammunition not
covered by subsection (a) of this section shall be subject to an excise tax of
11 percent of the sales price, to be paid by the seller. Firearms excise tax shall
be collected by a licensed firearm dealer at the time of a background check
under 13 V.S.A. § 4019 and shall be remitted using the return described in
section 7633 of this chapter.
VT LEG #379030 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.418
2025 Page 3 of 5
(1) Any amount collected in accordance with subsection (b) of this
section shall be deemed to be held by the person in trust for the State of
Vermont. The taxes collected shall be recorded by such person in an account
so as to clearly indicate the amount collected and that the taxes are the property
of the State of Vermont.
(2) Notwithstanding subdivision (1) of this subsection, a licensed
firearm dealer shall retain 10 percent of the tax collected pursuant to this
subsection as payment for collecting and remitting tax on behalf of the State of
Vermont.
(c) The tax imposed by this section is separate from and in addition to the
general sales and use tax imposed by chapter 233 of this title. The tax imposed
by this section shall not be part of the sales price to which the general sales and
use tax applies.
(d) The Commissioner may adopt rules pursuant to 3 V.S.A. chapter 25 to
carry out the administration and enforcement of this chapter. To the extent not
inconsistent with this chapter, the provisions for the assessment, collection,
enforcement, and appeals of the sales and use tax in chapter 233 of this title
shall apply to the tax imposed by this chapter.
(e) The tax imposed under this section shall not apply to a transfer exempt
from background checks under 13 V.S.A. § 4019(f).
VT LEG #379030 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.418
2025 Page 4 of 5
§ 7633. RETURNS; RECORDS
(a) Any licensed firearm dealer or ammunition vendor required to collect or
pay the tax imposed by this chapter shall pay and remit the tax in quarterly
installments on or before the 25th day of the calendar month succeeding the
quarter ending on the last day of March, June, September, and December of
each year. The return shall include a statement under oath of a person with
legal authority to bind the licensed firearm dealer or ammunition vendor, a
statement containing its name and place of business, the total amount of sales
subject to the firearm and ammunition excise tax made in the preceding
quarter, and any information required by the Department of Taxes, along with
the total tax due.
(b) Every licensed firearm dealer or ammunition vendor shall maintain, for
not less than three years, accurate records showing all transactions subject to
tax liability under this chapter. The records are subject to inspection by the
Department of Taxes at all reasonable times during normal business hours.
§ 7634. STATUTORY PURPOSE
The statutory purpose of the exemption for transfers to law enforcement
agencies and the U.S. Armed Forces is to avoid taxation of governmental
entities. The statutory purpose of the exemption for transfers between
immediate family members is because they are regarded differently under
Vermont criminal law.
VT LEG #379030 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.418
2025 Page 5 of 5
§ 7635. DEPOSIT OF REVENUE
The Commissioner shall deposit revenues from the tax imposed by this
chapter in the Domestic and Sexual Violence Special Fund under 13 V.S.A.
§ 5360.
Sec. 2. 13 V.S.A. § 5360 is amended to read:
§ 5360. DOMESTIC AND SEXUAL VIOLENCE SPECIAL FUND
A Domestic and Sexual Violence Special Fund is established, to be
managed in accordance with 32 V.S.A. chapter 7, subchapter 5 and
administered by the Center for Crime Victim Services created in section 5361
of this title. The revenues of the Fund shall consist of revenue from the
Firearms Excise Tax established under 32 V.S.A. chapter 204, that portion of
the additional surcharge on penalties and fines imposed by section 7282 of this
title deposited in the Domestic and Sexual Violence Special Fund and that
portion of the town clerks’ fee for issuing and recording civil marriage or civil
union licenses in 32 V.S.A. § 1712(1) deposited in the Domestic and Sexual
Violence Special Fund. The Fund may be expended by the Center for Crime
Victim Services for budgeted grants to the Vermont Network against Domestic
and Sexual Violence.
Sec. 3. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #379030 v.1